Hawaii statutes.
[§128D-6.5] Limitation of liability for
heavy fuel oil releases. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
liability of any person under section 128D-6 for any release of heavy fuel oil
from a tank barge carrying heavy fuel oil interisland shall not exceed
$700,000,000.

(b) For the purposes of subsection (a):

"Heavy fuel oil" includes petroleum
that is no. 6 technical grades of fuel oil and other grades such as navy
special fuel oil and bunker C.

"Release of heavy fuel oil" means a
release subject to the federal Oil Pollution Act of 1990.

"Tank barge" means any vessel that
carries oil in bulk as cargo or in residue and is not equipped with a means of
self propulsion. [L 1996, c 315, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next